Massachusetts, session 194th, H4762.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a 
special commission to study and provide recommendations on the feasibility of reforms to 
improve housing affordability, increase housing density, and reduce regulatory barriers in the 
Commonwealth. The commission shall: (1) Analyze the impact of zoning regulations, such as 
minimum lot sizes, height restrictions, and multi-family housing prohibitions, on housing supply 
and affordability; (2) Investigate the effects of exclusionary zoning practices that limit housing 
accessibility for low- and moderate-income residents; (3) Study best practices from other states 
and regions, particularly those employing higher-density development and streamlined 
regulatory processes; (4) Utilize econometric models and AI-driven methodologies to evaluate 
current housing regulations and propose cost-effective reforms; (5) The commission shall make 
determinations on the feasibility of implementing zoning reforms in Massachusetts, including 
incentivizing higher-density development and simplifying permitting processes.  
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the house and senate chairs of the Joint 
Committee on Housing, who shall serve as co-chairs; two members of the House of 

of 2 15 Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; two members of the 
Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate; the House Minority Leader or a designee; the 
Senate Minority Leader or a designee; the secretary of housing and livable communities, or their 
designee, a housing economist from the Federal Reserve Bank of Boston, appointed by its 
president; a municipal planner with experience in zoning reform, appointed by the Massachusetts 
Municipal Association; a representative from the Massachusetts Home Builders Association, 
appointed by its board of directors; a legal scholar specializing in property rights and land use 
law, appointed by the Dean of a Massachusetts law school; and a nonprofit housing advocate 
with experience in affordable housing development, appointed by the Governor.  
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its report and findings, along with any 
recommendations, to the house and senate committees on ways and means, the Joint Committee 
on Housing, and the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate no later than 
December 31, 2026.